Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3310
Sections, how construed with respect to liability.

Nothing in sections 60-3301 to 60-3311 shall be construed to provide greater liability than is already allowed under the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act or the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 10.

Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act, see section 13-901.

State Tort Claims Act, see section 81-8,235.